Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-7] Federal approval.
The department shall seek a waiver and other approvals from the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services that may be necessary to implement the nursing
facility sustainability program, including the approval of the contracts
between the State and medicaid managed care health plans. [L 2012, c 156, pt of
§2, §5; am L 2013, c 142, §§2(2), 3; am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next